Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 3 SERVICES WITH SPECIAL STATE PROVISIONS
25.5-5-323. Complex rehabilitation technology - no prior authorization - metrics - report - rules - legislative declaration - definitions.

The general assembly finds and declares it is in the best interests of the people of the state of Colorado to:

Continue to protect access to important technology and supporting services for eligible clients;

Establish and improve current safeguards relating to the delivery, provision, and repair of medically necessary complex rehabilitation technology;

Continue to provide supports for clients accessing complex rehabilitation technology to stay in the home or community setting; engage in basic activities of daily living and instrumental activities of daily living, including employment; prevent institutionalization; and prevent hospitalization and other costly secondary complications; and

Continue adequate pricing for complex rehabilitation technology for the purpose of allowing continued access to appropriate products and related services including maintenance and repair.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Complex rehabilitation technology" means individually configured manual wheelchair systems, power wheelchair systems, adaptive seating systems, alternative positioning systems, standing frames, gait trainers, and specifically designated options and accessories classified as durable medical equipment that:

Are individually configured for individuals to meet their specific and unique medical, physical, and functional needs and capacities for basic activities of daily living and instrumental activities of daily living, including employment, identified as medically necessary to promote mobility in the home and community or prevent hospitalization or institutionalization of the client;

Are primarily used to serve a medical purpose and generally not useful to a person in the absence of illness or injury; and

Require certain services provided by a qualified complex rehabilitation technology provider to ensure appropriate design, configuration, and use of such items, including patient evaluation or assessment of the client by a health-care professional, and that are consistent with the client's medical condition, physical and functional needs and capacities, body size, period of need, and intended use.

"Individually configured" means that a device has features, adjustments, or modifications specific to a client that a qualified complex rehabilitation technology supplier provides by measuring, fitting, programming, adjusting, adapting, and maintaining the device so that the device is consistent with an assessment or evaluation of the client by a health-care professional and consistent with the client's medical condition, physical and functional needs and capacities, body size, period of need, and intended use.

"Qualified complex rehabilitation technology professional" means an individual who is certified by the rehabilitation engineering and assistive technology society of North America or other nationally recognized accrediting organizations as an assistive technology professional.

"Qualified complex rehabilitation technology supplier" means a company or entity that:

Is accredited by a recognized accrediting organization as a supplier of complex rehabilitation technology;

Meets the supplier and quality standards established for durable medical equipment suppliers under the medicare or medicaid program;

Employs at least one qualified complex rehabilitation technology professional for each location to:

Analyze the needs and capacities of clients for a complex rehabilitation technology item in consultation with the evaluating clinical professionals;

Assist in selecting appropriate complex rehabilitation technology items for such needs and capacities; and

Provide the client technology-related training in the proper use and maintenance of the selected complex rehabilitation technology items;

Has the qualified complex rehabilitation technology professional directly involved with the assessment, and determination of the appropriate individually configured complex rehabilitation technology for the client, with such involvement to include seeing the client visually either in person or by any other real-time means within a reasonable time frame during the determination process.

Maintains a reasonable supply of parts, adequate physical facilities, and qualified service or repair technicians to provide clients with prompt service and repair of all complex rehabilitation technology it sells or supplies; and

Provides the client written information at the time of sale as to how to access service and repair.

The state department shall provide a separate recognition within the state's medicaid program established under articles 4, 5, and 6 of this title for complex rehabilitation technology and shall make other required changes to protect client access to appropriate products and services. Such separate recognition must take into consideration the customized nature of complex rehabilitation technology and the broad range of related services necessary to meet the unique medical and functional needs of clients and include the following:

The state department notifying the qualified rehabilitation technology suppliers concerning the parameters of the complex rehabilitation technology benefit, which benefit must include the use of qualified rehabilitation technology suppliers as well as billing procedures that specify the types of equipment identified and included in the complex rehabilitation technology benefit. The state department shall create complex rehabilitation technology benefit parameters that are easily understood by and accessible to clients and qualified rehabilitation technology suppliers. The state department shall provide public notice no later than thirty days prior to a collaborative process that includes discussion of any proposed changes to the types of equipment identified and included in the complex rehabilitation technology benefit.

Adopting specific supplier standards, as described in paragraph (d) of subsection (2) of this section, for companies or entities that provide complex rehabilitation technology and restricting the provision of complex rehabilitation technology to those companies or entities that are qualified complex rehabilitation suppliers;

Ensuring that clients receiving complex rehabilitation technology are evaluated or assessed, as needed, by:

A qualified health-care professional, including but not limited to a licensed physical therapist, a licensed occupational therapist, or other licensed health-care professional who has no financial relationship with the qualified complex rehabilitation technology supplier and performs specialty evaluations within his or her scope of practice; and

A qualified complex rehabilitation technology professional employed by the qualified complex rehabilitation technology supplier. The assessment and determination performed by the qualified complex rehabilitation technology professional employed by the qualified complex rehabilitation supplier shall continue to be included in the reimbursement for the purchased or rented complex rehabilitation technology;

Continuing pricing policies for complex rehabilitation technology, unless specifically prohibited by the centers for medicare and medicaid services, including the following:

Continuing to ensure that the reimbursement amounts for complex rehabilitation technology, repairs, and supporting clinical complex rehabilitation technology services are adequate to ensure that qualified clients have access to the items, taking into account the unique needs of the clients and the complexity and customization of complex rehabilitation technology. This includes developing pricing policies that ensure access to adequate and timely repairs.

Exempting complex rehabilitation technology from inclusion in competitive bidding programs or similar processes; and

Preserving the option for complex rehabilitation technology to be billed and paid for as a purchase allowing for lump sum payments for devices with a length of need of one year or greater, excluding approved crossover claims for clients enrolled in medicare and medicaid; and

Making other changes as needed to protect access to complex rehabilitation technology for clients.

The state department shall not require prior authorization for any repair of complex rehabilitation technology.

No later than October 1, 2023, the state board shall promulgate rules establishing repair metrics for all complex rehabilitation technology suppliers and complex rehabilitation technology professionals. At a minimum, the metrics must include requirements for repairing complex rehabilitation technology in a timely manner and the expected quality of each repair. Prior to promulgating rules pursuant to this subsection (5)(a), the state department shall engage in a stakeholder process, which process must include qualified complex rehabilitation technology professionals, qualified complex rehabilitation technology suppliers, and complex rehabilitation technology clients.

Beginning January 2024, and each January thereafter, the state department shall report on the metrics developed pursuant to subsection (5)(a) of this section and compliance with the metrics as part of its "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" hearing required by section 2-7-203.

Three years after the date the repair metric rules are established pursuant to subsection (5)(a) of this section, the state department may engage in a stakeholder process to determine the need for additional accountability of a qualified complex rehabilitation technology supplier through financial penalties, audits, or similar tools, for violations of the repair metrics rules. If such a stakeholder process is convened, the process must include qualified complex rehabilitation technology professionals, qualified complex rehabilitation technology suppliers, complex rehabilitation clients, and an advocacy group for persons with disabilities.

Beginning December 1, 2024, the state department shall reimburse labor costs for repairs of complex rehabilitation technology at a rate that is twenty-five percent higher for clients residing in rural areas than the rate for clients residing in urban areas.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (HB 14-1211), ch. 253, p. 1008, § 1, effective January 1, 2015.

L. 2022:

(4), (5), (6), and (7) added, (HB 22-1290), ch. 328, p. 2313, § 1, effective June 2.

25.5-5-324. Nonemergency medical transportation - urgent and secure transportation need - report - repeal.

On or before January 1, 2019, the state department shall create and implement an efficient and cost-effective method for meeting urgent transportation needs within the existing nonemergency medical transportation benefit under the medical assistance program. Urgent transportation needs include discharge from inpatient, emergency services, and other urgent but nonemergency services, as determined by the state department.

The method created by the state department must include, at a minimum:

Medical service provider or facility access to approved transportation providers for patients with urgent transportation needs;

Access to transportation providers that have obtained the necessary background checks, drug tests, training, and vehicle inspections, as required by the state department; and

An efficient method for obtaining and paying for transportation services for urgent transportation needs.

The state department may contract for background checks, drug tests, training, and vehicle inspections that may be required pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

The state department shall annually report on the implementation and effectiveness of the process created in this section for meeting urgent and secure transportation needs within the nonemergency medical transportation benefit and secure transportation services benefit. The state department shall present the report as part of its annual "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" presentation required by section 2-7-203 to the health and human services committee of the senate and the public and behavioral health and human services committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committees.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I) to the contrary, the report required pursuant to this section shall continue until the beginning of the 2025 legislative session.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2025.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1321), ch. 346, p. 2064, § 1, effective May 30.

L. 2019:

(4)(a) amended, (SB 19-252), ch. 254, p. 2452, § 5, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(4)(a) amended, (HB 21-1085), ch. 355, p. 2311, § 3, effective June 27; (4)(a) amended, (SB 21-266), ch. 423, p. 2802, § 23, effective July 2.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (4)(a) by SB 21-266 and HB 21-1085 were harmonized.

25.5-5-325. Residential and inpatient substance use disorder treatment - medical detoxification services - federal approval - performance review report.

Subject to available appropriations and to the extent permitted under federal law, the medical assistance program pursuant to this article 5 and articles 4 and 6 of this title 25.5 includes residential and inpatient substance use disorder treatment and medical detoxification services. Participation in the residential and inpatient substance use disorder treatment and medical detoxification services benefit is limited to persons who meet nationally recognized, evidence-based level of care criteria for residential and inpatient substance use disorder treatment and medical detoxification services. The benefit shall serve persons with substance use disorders, including those with co-occurring mental health disorders. All levels of nationally recognized, evidence-based levels of care for residential and inpatient substance use disorder treatment and medical detoxification services must be included in the benefit.

No later than October 1, 2018, the state department shall seek federal authorization to provide residential and inpatient substance use disorder treatment and medical detoxification services with full federal financial participation. Residential and inpatient substance use disorder treatment and medical detoxification services shall not take effect until federal approval has been obtained.

Prior to seeking federal approval pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section, the state department shall seek input from relevant stakeholders, including existing providers of substance use disorder treatment and medical detoxification services and behavioral health administrative services organizations. The state department shall seek input and involve stakeholders in decisions regarding:

The coordination of benefits with behavioral health administrative services organizations and the office of behavioral health in the department of human services;

The most appropriate entity for administration of the benefit;

The provision of wraparound services needed during treatment and the provision of required services following treatment that may not be covered through the medical assistance program;

The authorization process for approval of services; and

The development of a reimbursement rate methodology to ensure sustainability that considers a provider's cost of providing care, including lower-volume providers in rural areas.

No later than January 15, 2022, the state department shall prepare and submit a performance review report to the joint budget committee and to the joint health and human services committee, or any successor committees, concerning the residential and inpatient substance use disorder treatment pursuant to this section, including, at a minimum:

(I) The number of persons who received services pursuant to this section and the service provided;

(II) The length of time that services were provided;

(III) The location where services were provided;

(IV) The effectiveness of the services provided, including the rate of relapse to substance use disorder following treatment; and

(V) Any other information as determined by the state department that is relevant to the benefit.

After considering the state department's performance review report, the general assembly may enact legislation modifying or repealing the benefit.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1136), ch. 373, p. 2269, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 2022:

IP(2)(b) and (2)(b)(I) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1597, § 242, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

Section 263(3) of chapter 222 (HB 22-1278), Session laws of Colorado 2022, provides that the act changing this section takes effect only if HB 22-1256 becomes law and takes effect either upon the effective date of HB 22-1256 or July 1, 2022, whichever is later. HB 22-1256 became law and took effect August 10, 2022.

25.5-5-326. Access to clinical trials - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Approved clinical trial" means a phase I, II, III, or IV clinical trial involving the prevention, detection, diagnosis, or treatment of a life-threatening or debilitating disease or condition if any one of the following conditions apply:

The clinical trial is conducted under an investigational new drug application or an investigational device exemption reviewed by the federal food and drug administration, or is exempted from review by the federal food and drug administration; or

The clinical trial is approved or funded by:

The national institutes of health;

The centers for disease control and prevention;

The agency for health care research and quality;

The federal centers for medicare and medicaid services;

A cooperative group or center of any of the entities described in subsections (1)(a)(II)(A) to (1)(a)(II)(D) of this section, the federal department of defense, or the federal department of veterans affairs;

A qualified nongovernmental research entity identified in guidelines issued by the national institutes of health for center support grants; or

The federal department of veterans affairs, the federal department of defense, or the federal department of energy, provided that review and approval of the clinical trial occurs through a system of peer review that is comparable to the peer review of clinical trials performed by the national institutes of health, including an unbiased review of the highest scientific standards by qualified individuals who have no interest in the outcome of the review.

"Life-threatening or debilitating disease or condition" means a disease or condition from which the likelihood of death is probable, or the disease or condition is progressive or significantly debilitating, unless the course of the disease or condition is interrupted.

"Qualified individual" means an individual who is eligible for and enrolled in the state medical assistance program and who a treating physician determines has a life-threatening or debilitating disease or condition and meets the selection criteria for the approved clinical trial.

"Routine costs" means medically necessary items and services that are included under the medical assistance program for a medical assistance recipient, to the extent that the provision of such items or services to the individual outside the course of such participation would otherwise be covered under the medical assistance program, without regard to whether the recipient is enrolled in a clinical trial. For medical assistance recipients participating in an approved clinical trial, "routine costs" include medically necessary items and services that are not otherwise excluded pursuant to subsection (1)(d)(II)(D) of this section, relating to the detection and treatment of complications arising from the medical assistance recipient's medical care, including complications relating to participation in the clinical trial, to the extent that the provision of such items or services to the individual outside the course of such participation would otherwise be included under the medical assistance program.

"Routine costs" do not include:

The investigational item, device, or service itself;

Items and services provided solely to satisfy the data collection and analysis needs of the clinical trial;

Items, drugs, or services customarily provided free of charge to any qualified individual enrolled in the clinical trial; or

Items, drugs, or services that the clinical trial is required to provide.

The medical assistance program established pursuant to this article 5 and articles 4 and 6 of this title 25.5 must include coverage and payment for the routine costs associated with participation in an approved clinical trial for a qualified individual.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire section added, (HB 20-1232), ch. 266, p. 1277, § 1, effective July 10.

25.5-5-327. Eligible peer support services - reimbursement - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Peer support professional" has the same meaning as defined in section 27-60-108 (2)(b).

"Recovery support services organization" has the same meaning as defined in section 27-60-108 (2)(c).

Subject to available appropriations and to the extent permitted under federal law, the medical assistance program pursuant to this article 5 and articles 4 and 6 of this title 25.5 includes peer support professional services provided to recipients through a recovery support services organization. Peer support professional services must not be provided to recipients until federal approval has been obtained.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1021), ch. 256, p. 1509, § 2, effective September 7.

25.5-5-328. Secure transportation for behavioral health crises - benefit - funding.

On or before January 1, 2023, the state department shall create a benefit for secure transportation services, as defined in section 25-3.5-103 (11.4). The state department shall research and create a plan to establish secure transportation services, which may include supplemental and coordinated community response services, to be implemented on or before July 1, 2023. The state department shall collaborate with the behavioral health administration in the department of human services in its research and planning efforts to determine how this benefit may align with co-responder, mobile crisis, and emergency crisis dispatch.

The state department is authorized to seek, accept, and expend gifts, grants, and donations from public or private sources for the purpose of funding the urgent transportation needs within the existing nonemergency medical transportation benefit and secure transportation services benefit under the medical assistance program, as set forth in subsection (1) of this section and section 25.5-5-324 (1).

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1085), ch. 355, p. 2312, § 4, effective June 27.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1515, § 75, effective July 1.

25.5-5-329. Family planning services - federal authorization - rules - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Eligible individual" means an individual who is not pregnant and whose income does not exceed the state's current effective income level for pregnant women under the children's basic health plan established pursuant to article 8 of title 25.5, and whose income is adjusted for family size based on the methodology allowed under federal law to count the applicant as a household of two in addition to any other household members, and who meets other requirements under federal law.

"Family-planning-related services" means services provided in a family planning setting as part of or as a follow-up to a family planning visit, including:

Medically necessary evaluations or preventive services, such as tobacco utilization screening, counseling, testing, and cessation services;

Cervical cancer screening and prevention;

Diagnosis or treatment of a sexually transmitted infection or sexually transmitted disease and medication and supplies to prevent a sexually transmitted infection or sexually transmitted disease; and

Any other medical diagnosis, treatment, or preventive service that is routinely provided pursuant to a family planning visit.

"Family planning services" means all services covered by the federal Title X family planning program, regardless of an individual's age, sex, or gender identity, or the age, sex, or gender identity of the individual's partner, including but not limited to:

All contraception, as defined in section 2-4-401 (1.5);

Health-care and counseling services focused on preventing, delaying, or planning for a pregnancy;

Follow-up visits to evaluate or manage problems associated with contraceptive methods;

Sterilization services, regardless of an individual's sex; and

Basic fertility services.

"Presumptive eligibility" has the same meaning as defined in section 25.5-5-204 (1).

No later than January 31, 2022, the state department shall seek federal authorization through an amendment to the state medical assistance plan to provide family planning services to eligible individuals.

The state plan amendment must:

Not impose age, sex, or gender identity limitations on eligible individuals; and

Include a process by which an eligible individual may be presumptively eligible to receive family planning services.

Upon approval of the state plan amendment, the state department shall:

Unless requested otherwise by the eligible individual, ensure that an eligible individual receives a one-year supply of self-administered hormonal contraceptives at one time as permitted by the eligible individual's prescription; and

Collaborate with the state insurance marketplace, health-care consumer advocates, and other interested stakeholders to educate eligible individuals about all available health-care coverage options and encourage eligible individuals to enroll in full health insurance coverage through available sources, including the medical assistance program, the children's basic health plan, a public benefit corporation, or the state insurance marketplace.

The state department shall promulgate any rules necessary to implement this section, including rules establishing the specific family-planning-related services and family planning services identified in subsections (1)(b) and (1)(c) of this section. Prior to promulgating the rules, the state department shall engage in a stakeholder process that attempts to include individuals who have received family planning services through the state's medical assistance program or the children's basic health plan, representatives of consumer advocacy organizations, and family planning providers. The stakeholders must be diverse with regard to race, ethnicity, immigration status, age, ability, sexual orientation, gender identity, or geographic region of the state.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-025), ch. 432, p. 2855, § 2, effective September 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 21-025, see section 1 of chapter 432, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

25.5-5-330. Screening for perinatal mood and anxiety disorder.

For the caregiver of each child enrolled in the medical assistance program in the state, the program must include screening for perinatal mood and anxiety disorders in accordance with the health resources and services administration guidelines.

The screening must be made available to the caregiver of each child enrolled in the medical assistance program, regardless of whether the caregiver is enrolled in the medical assistance program, so long as the caregiver's child is enrolled in the medical assistance program.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-137), ch. 362, p. 2366, § 12, effective June 28.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Behavioral Health Recovery Act of 2021") and the legislative declaration in SB 21-137, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 362, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

25.5-5-331. Federally qualified health center - clinical pharmacy services - reimbursement - rules.

Costs associated with services provided by clinical pharmacists through a federally qualified health center, as defined in the federal "Social Security Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 1395x (aa)(4), are considered allowable costs for the purpose of a federally qualified health center's cost report and must be included in the calculation of the reimbursement rate for a patient visit at a federally qualified health center.

The state department shall promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this section.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1275), ch. 470, p. 3379, § 2, effective September 7.

25.5-5-332. Therapy using equine movement - federal authorization - definition.

Subject to federal authorization and federal financial participation, on or after July 1, 2024, therapy using equine movement may be provided by a physical therapist licensed pursuant to article 285 of title 12, an occupational therapist licensed pursuant to article 270 of title 12, or a speech-language pathologist certified pursuant to article 305 of title 12.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "therapy using equine movement" means therapeutic activities that leverage horse-human interactions to facilitate progression toward meeting therapeutic goals.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1068), ch. 311, p. 2229, § 2, effective June 2.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1068, see section 1 of chapter 311, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.